Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2085YH (3) 91 je/js H.F. 281 Section 1. REPEAL. Sections 731.1, 731.2, 731.3, 731.4, and 1 731.5, Code 2025, are repealed. 2 EXPLANATION 3 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 4 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 5 This bill repeals provisions of law relating to a personâs 6 right to work at the personâs chosen occupation because 7 of membership in or refusal to join a labor organization; 8 a prohibition on employers refusing employment to a 9 person because of membership in or refusal to join a labor 10 organization; a prohibition on persons, employers, or labor 11 organizations entering into a contract to exclude a person from 12 employment because of membership in or refusal to join a labor 13 organization; a prohibition on persons, employers, or labor 14 organizations requiring a person to pay labor organization dues 15 as a condition of employment; and a prohibition on persons, 16 employers, or labor organizations deducting labor organization 17 dues from an employeeâs wages unless the employer has first 18 been presented with an individual written order signed by the 19 employee. 20 -1- LSB 2085YH (3) 91 je/js 1/ 1